South Dakota, session 2026, SB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-2:
A county shall provide to each township supervisor who has an oath filed in the
office of the county auditor, pursuant to § 8-4-3, written notice of any application for the
conditional use of real property or any appeal filed pursuant to this chapter, for property
located in the township, at least ten days before the board of adjustment or other
approving authority holds a public hearing on the application or appeal.

26.919.11 2 237
An Act to require that counties provide written notice to township supervisors of conditional
use applications and appeals.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 237
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 237 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB237 ENROLLED